South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S727.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 38-77-150 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) An insurer may not increase an insured's premium solely because the insured made a claim under his uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage as long as the insured was not at fault in the accident leading to the claim. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----